Washington statutes.
RCW 38.42.030

Protection of persons secondarily liable.

(1) Whenever pursuant to this chapter a court stays, postpones, or suspends (a) the enforcement of an obligation or liability, (b) the prosecution of a suit or proceeding, (c) the entry or enforcement of an order, writ, judgment, or decree, or (d) the performance of any other act, the court may likewise grant such a stay, postponement, or suspension to a surety, guarantor, endorser, accommodation maker, comaker, or other person who is or may be primarily or secondarily subject to the obligation or liability the performance or enforcement of which is stayed, postponed, or suspended.

(2) When a judgment or decree is vacated or set aside, in whole or in part, pursuant to this chapter, the court may also set aside or vacate, as the case may be, the judgment or decree as to a surety, guarantor, endorser, accommodation maker, comaker, or other person who is or may be primarily or secondarily liable on the contract or liability for the enforcement of the judgment decree.

[ 2005 c 254 s 3.]